Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-503
Trustees; perpetual succession; general powers; service of process.

The trustees who may be appointed under the provisions of section 12-501 shall have perpetual succession, and shall be capable in law of contracting, and prosecuting and defending suits at law and in equity. The cemetery association may be served in the manner provided for service of a summons on a corporation.

R.S.1866, c. 25, § 47, p. 206;

R.S.1913, § 681;

C.S.1922, § 590;

C.S.1929, § 13-503;

R.S.1943, § 12-503;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 2.

Trustees of the association chosen from time to time have perpetual succession. State ex rel. Craig v. Offutt, 121 Neb. 76, 236 N.W. 174 (1931).